Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-424
Health and safety regulations; violations; penalty.

Every person who shall violate any of the provisions of sections 48-401 to 48-423 shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. IV, art. IV, § 20, p. 562;

C.S.1922, § 7701;

C.S.1929, § 48-420;

R.S.1943, § 48-424;

Laws 1965, c. 284, § 1, p. 813;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 284.

Requirements of act did not apply to a landlord who was not occupant of building or operator of safety device. Quist v. Duda, 159 Neb. 393, 67 N.W.2d 481 (1954).